Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-21-158.
Advanced practice registered nurses; signature authority.

Except as otherwise provided by law and including the restriction in W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i)(A), an advanced practice registered nurse acting within the scope of the advanced practice registered nurse’s practice may fulfill any requirement for a signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, endorsement or other acknowledgement by a physician. Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of an advanced practice registered nurse as provided in this article.

History.

2020 ch. 57, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 57, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.